Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.220

Penalty—Jurisdiction.

Any person who wilfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars and by imprisonment in the county jail for not longer than thirty days or by both such fine and imprisonment. The superior court shall have jurisdiction of all such offenses.

[ 1959 c 1 s 22 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]